Louisiana, session 2026, HB893.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:4084(A)(1)(a) and (b) and (C) are hereby amended and reenacted
to read as follows:
§4084. Purchase of supplies; machinery and equipment; emergency purchase;
preference to home merchants
A.(1)(a) All purchases of materials or supplies required by the board for the
conduct, operation, maintenance, and repair of the public systems of sewerage,
water, and drainage exceeding the sum of thirty thousand dollars shall be advertised
and let by contract to the lowest responsible bidder who has bid according to the
contract plans and specifications as advertised shall be made in accordance with the
provisions of R.S. 38:2212.1(A)(1)(a).
(b) However, purchases of ten thousand dollars or more, but not more than
thirty thousand dollars, shall be made by obtaining not less than three quotes by
telephone, facsimile, email, or any other electronic form. If telephone quotes are
received, a written confirmation of the accepted offers shall be obtained and made
a part of the purchase file. If quotations lower than the accepted quotation are
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 893 ENROLLED
received, the reasons for their rejection shall be recorded in the purchase file made
within the threshold set by R.S. 38:2212.1(A)(1)(b) shall be made in accordance with
the provisions of that Subparagraph.
* * *
C. In the event of an emergency the executive director or the general
superintendent of the board may, with the written consent of the president pro
tempore of the board or the mayor of the city, contract a bill for such supplies and
materials, not exceeding ten thirty thousand dollars in amount. However, all bills so
contracted shall be reported, with the reasons for the emergency, to the board at its
next meeting.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 33:4084(A)(1)(c) is hereby repealed in its entirety.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.